Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,129
Commission;
suspend or modify reporting requirements; conditions.

The
commission, by order, may suspend or modify any of the reporting requirements
of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act,
in a particular case, for good cause shown, or if it finds that literal application
of the act works a manifestly
unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that such suspension or modification
will not frustrate the purposes of the act. Any
such suspension or modification shall be only to the extent necessary to substantially
relieve the hardship. The commission shall suspend or modify any reporting
requirements only if it determines that facts exist that are clear and convincing
proof of the findings required by this section.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 129;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 587, § 19;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 33.